Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5414
Rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Rural Economic Opportunities Act.

Laws 2000, LB 936, § 14.